Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 1 Regulation of Hospitals and Related Institutions
31-7-12.2.
Regulation and licensing of assisted living communities; legislative intent; definitions; procedures; requirements for medication aides.

It is the intention of the General Assembly to establish a new licensure category of long-term care provider which shall be referred to as “assisted living community.” An assisted living community shall be authorized, in accordance with this Code section, to provide certain services that are beyond the scope of services that a personal care home is authorized to provide.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Ambulatory” means the ability to move from place to place by walking, either unaided or aided by a prosthesis, brace, cane, crutches, walker, or hand rails, or by propelling a wheelchair and to respond to an emergency condition, whether caused by fire or otherwise, and escape with minimal human assistance using the normal means of egress.

“Assisted living care” includes:

Personal services, which includes, but is not limited to, individual assistance with or supervision of self-administered medication and essential activities of daily living such as eating, bathing, grooming, dressing, and toileting;

The administration of medications by a medication aide in accordance with this Code section;

The provision of assisted self-preservation in accordance with this Code section; and

The provision of limited nursing services.

“Assisted living community” means a personal care home with a minimum of 25 beds that is licensed as an assisted living community pursuant to Code Section 31-7-3.

“Assisted self-preservation” means the capacity of a resident to be evacuated from an assisted living community, to a designated point of safety and within an established period of time as determined by the office of Safety Fire Commissioner. Assisted self-preservation is a function of all of the following:

The condition of the individual;

The assistance that is available to be provided to the individual by the staff of the assisted living community; and

The construction of the building in which the assisted living community is housed, including whether such building meets the state fire safety requirements applicable to an existing health care occupancy.

“Continuous medical or nursing care” means medical or nursing care required other than on a periodic basis or for a short-term illness.

“Direct care staff person” means any employee, facility volunteer, or contract staff who provides to residents:

Any personal services, including but not limited to, medication administration or assistance, assistance with ambulation and transfer, and essential activities of daily living such as eating, bathing, grooming, dressing, and toileting; or

Any other limited nursing services.

“Limited nursing services” means the assessment of the physical, mental, and emotional status to determine the appropriate level of care for an individual; the performance of health maintenance activities, as defined in division (a)(9)(C)(ii) of Code Section 43-26-12; and the provision of any nursing care within the direct care staff person’s scope of practice that can be completed within seven days or intermittently.

An assisted living community shall not admit or retain an individual who is not ambulatory unless the individual is capable of assisted self-preservation. In the event that the department determines that one or more residents of an assisted living community are not capable of assisted self-preservation due to the condition of the resident, the capabilities of the staff of the assisted living community, the construction of the building in which the assisted living community is housed, or a combination of these factors, the department shall have the authority to consider any of the following actions:

An increase in the staffing of the assisted living community to a level that is sufficient to ensure that each resident is capable of assisted self-preservation;

A change in the staffing assignments of the assisted living community if such change would ensure that each resident is capable of assisted self-preservation;

A change in rooms or the location of residents as necessary to ensure that each resident is capable of assisted self-preservation;

The utilization of any specialized equipment that would ensure that each resident is capable of assisted self-preservation. For purposes of this paragraph, specialized equipment shall only include a prosthesis, brace, cane, crutches, walker, hand rails, and a wheelchair;

A cessation in the further admission of individuals who are not ambulatory until such time that the assisted living community has taken actions necessary to ensure that all residents are capable of assisted self-preservation;

The transfer or discharge of any resident who is not capable of assisted self-preservation; and

Any action set forth in Code Section 31-2-8.

An assisted living community shall maintain a current list of all residents who are not ambulatory but who are capable of assisted self-preservation. The list shall be provided upon request to the department and maintained at all times by the assisted living community.

An assisted living community shall maintain fire detection and prevention equipment, including visual signals with alarms for hearing impaired residents, in accordance with manufacturer instructions and the requirements of the Office of the Safety Fire Commissioner.

An assisted living community shall not admit or retain an individual who is in need of continuous medical or nursing care. Other than as permitted by a medication aide pursuant to paragraph (7) of subsection (g) of this Code section or for limited nursing services provided by a registered professional nurse or licensed practical nurse pursuant to subparagraph (b)(2)(D) of this Code section, medical, nursing, or health services required on a periodic basis, or for short-term illness, shall not be provided as services of an assisted living community. When such services are required, they shall be purchased by the resident or the resident’s representative or legal surrogate, if any, from appropriate providers managed independently from the assisted living community. An assisted living community may assist in arranging for such services, but not in the provision of such services.

An assisted living community may employ certified medication aides for the purpose of performing the technical aspects of the administration of certain medications in accordance with this subsection. An assisted living community that employs one or more certified medication aides must have a safe medication and treatment administration system that meets all the requirements of this subsection.

The department shall establish and maintain a medication aide registry containing the names of each individual in Georgia who is certified by the department as a medication aide. An assisted living community may not employ an individual as a medication aide unless such individual is listed in the medication aide registry in good standing.

An applicant for certification as a medication aide shall meet the following qualifications:

Be a Georgia certified nurse aide with current certification in good standing;

Have successfully completed a state approved medication aide training program administered by a Georgia licensed registered nurse, pharmacist, or physician;

Have successfully passed, with a minimum passing score of 80 percent, a written competency examination; and

Have demonstrated the requisite clinical skills to serve as a medication aide in accordance with a standardized checklist developed by the department.

A record of the successful completion of the written competency examination and clinical skills standardized checklist by an applicant for certification as a medication aide shall be included in the medication aide registry within 30 business days of evaluation. Each candidate for certification as a medication aide shall have the opportunity to take the written competency examination three times before being required to retake and successfully complete the medication aide training program.

An assisted living community shall annually conduct a comprehensive clinical skills competency review of each medication aide employed by the assisted living community.

Certificates issued pursuant to this subsection shall be renewed biennially according to schedules and fees approved by the department.

A medication aide who meets the criteria established in this subsection shall be permitted to perform the following tasks in an assisted living community in accordance with the written instructions of a physician:

Administer physician ordered oral, ophthalmic, topical, otic, nasal, vaginal, and rectal medications;

Administer insulin, epinephrine, and B12 pursuant to physician direction and protocol;

Administer medication via a metered dose inhaler;

Conduct finger stick blood glucose testing following established protocol;

Administer a commercially prepared disposable enema as ordered by a physician;

Assist residents in the supervision of self-administration of medication; and

Administer liquid morphine to a resident of the assisted living community who is the patient of a licensed hospice, pursuant to a hospice physician’s written order that contains specific instructions for indication, dosage, frequency, and route of administration, provided that the licensed hospice consents to the use and administration of liquid morphine as described in this subparagraph. The medication aide shall observe and document the resident’s need for all “as needed” (PRN) liquid morphine in such resident’s record and such indications of need may include verbalizations of pain, groaning, grimacing, or restlessness. The initial dose of any liquid morphine administered pursuant to this subparagraph shall be administered and assessed by a licensed hospice health care professional to observe and address any adverse reactions to such medication. The assisted living community shall ensure that any medication aides who will be administering liquid morphine to any hospice patients in such assisted living community pursuant to this subparagraph receive adequate training from a licensed hospice on the safe and proper administration of liquid morphine prior to such administration and on an annual basis thereafter. The assisted living community shall maintain documentation of all training provided and shall adhere to all security and storage requirements for liquid morphine required under state and federal law, including but not limited to any rules promulgated by the department. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the supply of liquid morphine on-site at the assisted living community shall be limited to no more than 50 ml for each hospice patient in the assisted living community and shall only be administered under limited circumstances when a licensed hospice health care professional is not otherwise available. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement this subparagraph. The authority provided to a medication aide pursuant to this subparagraph shall be in addition to the authority provided to a medication aide pursuant to subparagraphs (A) through (F) of this paragraph and shall not be construed to limit any authority or practice of a medication aide in effect prior to May 11, 2019.

A medication aide shall record in the medication administration record all medications that such medication aide has personally administered to a resident of an assisted living community and any refusal of a resident to take a medication. A medication aide shall observe a resident to whom medication has been administered and shall report any changes in the condition of such resident to the personal representative or legal surrogate of such resident.

All medication administered by a medication aide in accordance with this Code section shall be in unit or multidose packaging.

An assisted living community that employs one or more medication aides to administer medications in accordance with this subsection shall secure the services of a licensed pharmacist to perform the following duties:

Perform a quarterly review of the drug regimen of each resident of the assisted living community and report any irregularities to the assisted living community administrator;

Remove for proper disposal any drugs that are expired, discontinued, in a deteriorated condition, or when the resident for whom such drugs were ordered is no longer a resident;

Establish or review policies and procedures for safe and effective drug therapy, distribution, use, and control; and

Monitor compliance with established policies and procedures for medication handling and storage.

An assisted living community that employs one or more medication aides to administer medications in accordance with this subsection shall ensure that each medication aide receives ongoing medication training as prescribed by the department. A registered professional nurse or pharmacist shall conduct random medication administration observations on a quarterly basis and report any issues to the assisted living community administrator.

An assisted living community shall establish a written care plan for each resident. Such care plan shall describe the needs of the resident and how such needs will be met.

An assisted living community shall not be permitted to enroll as a provider of medical assistance, as defined in paragraph (6) of Code Section 49-4-141, or receive any funds authorized or paid pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act.

On and after July 1, 2021, all assisted living communities shall be required to meet the following staffing and training requirements:

Ensure that each direct care staff person in the assisted living community receives initial and annual training covering topics specified by the department to ensure a demonstrated knowledge and understanding of caring for elderly and disabled adults; and

Maintain the following minimum staffing requirements:

An average monthly minimum on-site staffing ratio of one direct care staff person for every 15 residents during all waking hours and one direct care staff person for every 20 residents during all nonwaking hours; provided, however, that either such ratio is adequate to meet the needs of the residents;

At least two on-site direct care staff persons at all times; and

A registered professional nurse or licensed practical nurse on-site, as follows:

For assisted living communities with one to 30 residents, a minimum of eight hours per week;

For assisted living communities with 31 to 60 residents, a minimum of 16 hours per week;

For assisted living communities with 61 to 90 residents, a minimum of 24 hours per week; or

For assisted living communities with more than 90 residents, a minimum of 40 hours per week.

On and after July 1, 2021, all assisted living communities shall be required to meet the following financial stability requirements:

Upon initial application for an assisted living community license, provide a financial stability affidavit from a certified public accountant affirming the applicant’s ability to operate as a going concern for the next two years;

Provide a minimum of 60 days’ written notice to the department and all residents of any impending bankruptcy or property eviction that may force discharge or relocation of residents or otherwise adversely impact the provision of safe care and oversight; and

Provide a minimum of 14 days’ written notice to the department and all residents of any impending change of ownership that may force discharge or relocation of residents or otherwise adversely impact the provision of safe care and oversight.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-12.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 1/SB 178; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 31/HB 942; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1052, § 1/HB 374; Ga. L. 2020, p. 95, § 6/HB 987.

U.S. Code.

Title XIX of the Social Security Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 1396

et seq.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 11, 2019, substituted “such” for “the” in the second sentence of paragraph (g)(2) and in the first and second sentences in paragraph (g)(8); substituted “state approved” for “state-approved” in subparagraph (g)(3)(B); deleted “and” at the end of subparagraph (g)(7)(E); added “; and” at the end of subparagraph (g)(7)(F); and added subparagraph (g)(7)(G); inserted “shall” following “administered and” in the middle of the second sentence of paragraph (g)(8); and substituted “when” for “where” in the middle of subparagraph (g)(10)(B).

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, in subsection (b), deleted “and” at the end of subparagraph (b)(2)(B); substituted “; and” for a period at the end of subparagraph (b)(2)(C); added subparagraph (b)(2)(D); substituted “office of Safety Fire Commissioner” for “Office of the Safety Fire Commissioner” at the end of paragraph (b)(4); added paragraphs (b)(6) and (b)(7); inserted “or for limited nursing services provided by a registered professional nurse or licensed practical nurse pursuant to subparagraph (b)(2)(D) of this Code section” in the second sentence of subsection (f); and added subsections (j) and (k).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, “31-2-8” was substituted for “31-2-11” at the end of paragraph (c)(7).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, “aide in effect prior to May 11, 2019” was substituted for “aide in effect prior to the effective date of this subparagraph” at the end of the last sentence of subparagraph (g)(7)(G).

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 04.08.20.03, 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 03.31.21.03, 04.30.21.01, and 05.28.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

31-7-12.3.
Adoption of rules and regulations to implement Code Sections 31-7-12 and 31-7-12.2.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations to implement Code Sections 31-7-12 and 31-7-12.2. Notwithstanding the provision of limited nursing services by assisted living communities, such rules and regulations shall establish meaningful distinctions between the levels of care provided by personal care homes, assisted living communities, and nursing homes but shall not curtail the scope or levels of services provided by personal care homes or nursing homes as of June 30, 2011; provided, however, that nothing in this chapter shall preclude the department from issuing waivers or variances to personal care homes of the rules and regulations established pursuant to this Code section. Notwithstanding Code Section 31-7-12.2, the department shall not grant a waiver or variance unless:

There are adequate standards affording protection for the health and safety of residents of the personal care home;

The resident of the personal care home provides a medical assessment conducted by a licensed health care professional who is unaffiliated with the personal care home which identifies the needs of the resident; and

The department finds that the personal care home can provide or arrange for the appropriate level of care for the resident.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-12.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 1/SB 178; Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 1-2/SB 406; Ga. L. 2020, p. 95, § 7/HB 987.

The 2018 amendment,

effective October 1, 2019, deleted “31-2-9 or” preceding “31-7-12.2” near the end of the introductory paragraph of this Code section.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, substituted “Notwithstanding the provision of limited nursing services by assisted living communities, such rules” for “Such rules” at the beginning of the second sentence of the introductory paragraph.

31-7-12.4.
Certificate for operation of memory care center required; staffing and training requirements; other requirements; regulation.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Alzheimer’s” means having characteristics of Alzheimer’s disease, a progressive and degenerative brain disease that causes impairment or change in memory, thinking, or behavior.

“Assisted living community” means a facility licensed pursuant to Code Section 31-7-12.2.

“Certificate” means a certificate issued by the department pursuant to this Code section to operate a memory care center.

“Dementia” means any disease from a class of degenerative brain disorders that cause impairment or changes in memory, thinking, or behavior that are progressive and irreversible. Such diseases include, but are not limited to, Alzheimer’s disease, Lewy body dementia, frontotemporal dementia, and vascular dementia.

“Direct care staff person” means any employee, facility volunteer, or contract staff who provides to residents:

Any personal services, including but not limited to, medication administration or assistance, assistance with ambulation and transfer, and essential activities of daily living such as eating, bathing, grooming, dressing, and toileting; or

Any other limited nursing services, as defined in subsection (b) of Code Section 31-7-12.2.

“Memory care center” means a freestanding or incorporated specialized unit within an assisted living community or personal care home that either:

Holds itself out as providing additional or specialized care to persons with diagnoses of probable Alzheimer’s or other dementias or with cognitive deficits that may place the resident at risk; or

Charges higher rates for care for residents with Alzheimer’s or other dementias than for care to other residents.

“Personal care home” means a facility licensed pursuant to Code Section 31-7-12.

On and after July 1, 2021, no assisted living community or personal care home shall operate a memory care center without first obtaining a certificate from the department. A certificate issued pursuant to this Code section shall not be assignable or transferable. In order to receive a certificate from the department to operate a memory care center, an applicant shall meet and be subject to the requirements contained in this Code section and in rules and regulations established by the department.

A memory care center shall meet the following minimum staffing requirements:

One dementia trained direct care staff person for every 12 residents on-site during all waking hours and for every 15 residents on-site during all nonwaking hours based on a monthly average; provided, however, that such ratio is adequate to meet the needs of the residents;

One registered professional nurse, licensed practical nurse, or certified medication aide on-site at all times;

Two direct care staff persons on-site at all times; and

One registered professional nurse or licensed practical nurse on-site or available in the building at all times as follows:

For memory care centers with one to 12 residents, a minimum of eight hours per week;

For memory care centers with 13 to 30 residents, a minimum of 16 hours per week;

For memory care centers with 31 to 40 residents, a minimum of 24 hours per week; or

For memory care centers with more than 40 residents, a minimum of 40 hours per week.

A memory care center shall meet the following training requirements:

All staff, regardless of role, shall receive at least four hours of dementia-specific orientation within the first 30 days of working in the center. Such orientation shall include:

Basic information about the nature, progression, and management of Alzheimer’s and other dementias;

Techniques for creating an environment that minimizes challenging behavior from residents with Alzheimer’s and other dementias;

Methods of identifying and minimizing safety risks to residents with Alzheimer’s and other dementias; and

Techniques for successful communication with individuals with Alzheimer’s and other dementias;

All direct care staff personnel shall receive initial orientation training within the first 30 days of caring for residents independently that, at a minimum, includes:

General training, to include:

Development, updating, and implementation of comprehensive and individual service plans;

Skills for recognizing physical or cognitive changes in the resident that warrant seeking medical attention;

Residents’ rights and identification of conduct constituting abuse, neglect, or exploitation;

General infection control principles;

Emergency preparedness training;

Emergency first aid; and

Cardiopulmonary resuscitation; and

Specialized training in dementia care, to include:

The nature of Alzheimer’s and other dementias;

The center’s philosophy related to the care of residents with Alzheimer’s and other dementias;

The center’s policies and procedures related to care of residents with Alzheimer’s and other dementias;

Common behavior problems characteristic of residents with Alzheimer’s and other dementias;

Positive therapeutic interventions and activities;

Skills for maintaining the safety of the resident; and

The role of the family in caring for residents with Alzheimer’s and other dementias;

Direct care staff personnel shall complete a minimum of 16 hours of specialized training in dementia care within the first 30 days of working independently with residents with Alzheimer’s or other dementias, and a minimum of eight hours of such specialized training in dementia care annually thereafter; and

The memory care center shall maintain documentation reflecting course content, instructor qualifications, agenda, and attendance rosters for all training sessions provided.

The department shall establish such other requirements as deemed necessary to protect the well-being of residents with Alzheimer’s and other dementias, which shall include, but shall not be limited to, requirements relating to:

Admission policies and procedures, assessment of residents, and development of written care plans;

Physical design, environment, and safety measures to accommodate and protect residents; and

Measures and protocols to address and prevent the elopement of residents, including appropriate safety devices and maintaining current photographs of residents.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this Code section.

In accordance with subsection (b) of Code Section 31-2-7, the department upon application or petition may, in its discretion, grant variances and waivers of the rules and regulations applicable to memory care centers.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-12.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 95, § 8/HB 987.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective June 30, 2020.

Cross references.

Alzheimer’s and related dementias state plan, §

49-6-90

.

31-7-12.5.
Notification and other requirements for COVID-19 infections in personal care homes.

As used in this Code section, the term “COVID-19” means coronavirus disease 2019.

Each personal care home with 25 or more beds, each assisted living community, and each nursing home licensed in this state shall:

Inform its residents and their representatives or legal surrogates by 5:00 P.M. the next calendar day following the occurrence of either a single confirmed infection of COVID-19 or another airborne infectious disease identified by the department or the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention as a threat to public health, or three or more residents or staff with new-onset of respiratory symptoms occurring within 72 hours of each other. Such information shall:

Not include personally identifiable information;

Include information on mitigating actions implemented to prevent or reduce the risk of transmission, including if normal operations of the facility will be altered; and

Include any cumulative updates for residents and their representatives or legal surrogates at least weekly or by 5:00 P.M. the next calendar day following the occurrence of any subsequent confirmed infection of COVID-19, or whenever three or more residents or staff with new onset of respiratory symptoms occurs within 72 hours of each other;

Maintain a minimum of a seven-day supply of protective masks, surgical gowns, eye protection, and gloves sufficient to protect all residents and staff;

Maintain and publish for its residents and their representatives or legal surrogates policies and procedures pertaining to infection control and mitigation within their facilities and update such policies and procedures annually; and

As part of the facility’s disaster preparedness plan required pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 31-7-3 and department rules and regulations, include an epidemic and pandemic plan for influenza and other infectious diseases which conforms to department and federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention standards that contains the following minimum elements:

Protocols for surveillance and detection of epidemic and pandemic diseases in residents and staff;

A communication plan for sharing information with public health authorities, residents, residents’ representatives or their legal surrogates, and staff;

An education and training plan for residents and staff regarding infection control protocols;

An infection control plan that addresses visitation, cohorting measures, sick leave and return-to-work policies, and testing and immunization policies; and

A surge capacity plan that addresses protocols for contingency staffing and supply shortages.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-12.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 95, § 8/HB 987.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective June 30, 2020.

31-7-12.6.
SARS CoV-2 testing for residents and staff in long-term care facilities.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Direct care staff person” means any employee, facility volunteer, or contract staff who provides to residents:

Any personal services, including but not limited to, medication administration or assistance, assistance with ambulation and transfer, and essential activities of daily living such as eating, bathing, grooming, dressing, and toileting; or

Any other limited nursing services, as defined in subsection (b) of Code Section 31-7-12.2.

“Long-term care facility” means a personal care home with 25 or more beds, an assisted living community, or a nursing home licensed in this state.

No later than September 28, 2020, each resident and direct care staff person in a long-term care facility in this state shall be required to receive an initial baseline molecular SARS CoV-2 test as outlined by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention; provided, however, that residents and direct care staff persons tested prior to June 30, 2020, shall not be required to receive such test.

The department shall be authorized to establish rules and regulations to require testing of new residents and direct care staff persons on and after September 28, 2020.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-12.6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 95, § 8/HB 987.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective June 30, 2020.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, in subsection (b), substituted “September 28, 2020,” for “90 days after the effective date of this Act” at the beginning and substituted “June 30, 2020,” for “the effective date of this Act” near the end; and substituted “September 28, 2020” for “90 days after the effective date of this Act” at the end of subsection (c).

31-7-12.7.
Employment of certified medication aides in nursing homes; competency review; authorized task; review by pharmacists; ongoing medication training; administration of narcotics prohibited.

A nursing home may employ certified medication aides for the purpose of performing the technical aspects of the administration of certain medications in accordance with this Code section.

A nursing home shall not employ an individual as a certified medication aide unless such individual is listed in the medication aide registry established and maintained by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (g) of Code Section 31-7-12.2, is in good standing with the department, and has met all of the qualifications in paragraph (3) of subsection (g) of Code Section 31-7-12.2.

A nursing home shall annually conduct a comprehensive clinical skills competency review of each certified medication aide employed by such nursing home.

A certified medication aide who meets the criteria established in this Code section shall be permitted to perform the following tasks in a nursing home in accordance with the written instructions of a physician:

Administer physician ordered oral, ophthalmic, topical, otic, nasal, vaginal, and rectal medications;

Administer insulin, epinephrine, and B12 pursuant to physician direction and protocol;

Administer medications via a metered dose inhaler;

Conduct finger stick blood glucose testing following established protocol;

Administer a commercially prepared disposable enema as ordered by a physician; and

Assist residents in the supervision of self-administration of medications.

A certified medication aide shall record in the medication administration record all medications that such certified medication aide has personally administered to a resident of a nursing home and any refusal of a resident to take a medication. A certified medication aide shall observe a resident to whom a medication has been administered and shall report any changes in the condition of such resident to a charge nurse.

All medications administered by a certified medication aide in accordance with this Code section shall be in unit or multidose packaging.

A nursing home that employs one or more certified medication aides to administer medications in accordance with this Code section shall secure the services of a licensed pharmacist to perform the following duties as part of the nursing home’s peer review, medical review, and quality assurance functions:

Perform a quarterly review of the drug regimen of each resident of the nursing home and report any irregularities to the nursing home administrator;

Remove for proper disposal any drugs that are expired, discontinued, in a deteriorated condition, or when the resident for whom such drugs were ordered is no longer a resident;

Establish or review policies and procedures for safe and effective drug therapy, distribution, use, and control; and

Monitor compliance with established policies and procedures for medication handling and storage.

A nursing home that employs one or more certified medication aides to administer medications in accordance with this Code section shall ensure that each certified medication aide receives ongoing medication training as prescribed by the department. A registered professional nurse or pharmacist shall conduct quarterly unannounced medication administration observations and report any issues to the nursing home administrator.

Nothing in this Code section shall authorize certified medication aides employed by a nursing home to administer any Schedule II controlled substance that is a narcotic.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-12.7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 465, § 1/SB 215.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 4, 2021.

31-7-12.8.
Employer sponsored certified nurse aide training and competency examination programs.

The department shall approve employer based programs sponsored by or offered in assisted living communities, private home care providers, personal care homes, or other long-term care facilities licensed by the department for certified nurse aide training and competency examination programs, in the same manner as such programs are approved in nursing homes, as determined by the department. The department shall require all employer based programs to meet the requirements set forth in 42 C.F.R. 483.152 and other applicable laws and regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-12.8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 465, § 1/SB 215.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 4, 2021.

31-7-13.
Transfer of property upon death of patient.

Whenever any person dies in a hospital licensed pursuant to this chapter, in any federal hospital operating within this state, or any nursing home operated within this state, such hospital or nursing home shall be authorized but shall not be required to transfer possession of any property, tangible or intangible, of such patient which is in the possession of the hospital or nursing home, to the following persons:

To the person designated by the patient in writing upon admission to the hospital or nursing home, if any;

To the surviving spouse of the patient, if any;

If no surviving spouse, to any adult child of the patient, and if no such adult child, to any person acting in loco parentis of any minor child;

If no surviving spouse or surviving children, to either parent of the patient;

If none of the above, then to any brother or sister of the patient; or

If none of the above, to the person assuming responsibility for burial of the patient.

The transfer of possession to the surviving spouse or any of the other family members or persons listed in subsection (a) of this Code section shall operate as a complete acquittal and discharge to the hospital or nursing home of liability from any suit, claim, or demand of whatever nature by any heir, distributee, or creditor of the patient, or any other person as relates to the property transferred. Such distribution is authorized to be made as provided in this Code section without the necessity of administration of the estate of the patient and without the necessity of obtaining an order that no administration of such estate is necessary.

The transfer of possession provided for in this Code section shall in no way affect the legal ownership or title to any property so transferred.

The provisions of any law of descent or distribution or any will or other instrument providing for disposition of property shall not be impaired by this Code section, and any person to whom property is transferred pursuant to this Code section may be required to transfer that property in conformity with the disposition of property required by such laws of descent or distribution or such will or other instrument.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 778, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 31/SB 46.

Code Commission notes.

Code Section 31-7-11 was added to the Code by both Ga. L. 1983, p. 1307, § 1, and Ga. L. 1984, p. 778, § 1. The former is set out as Code Section 31-7-11 and the latter is set out above as Code Section 31-7-13 pursuant to the authority granted by Code Section 28-9-5.